Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-334
Commission; subpoenas; discovery orders; violations; penalty.

(1) The commission may issue subpoenas and order discovery in aid of investigations and hearings under the Nebraska Fair Housing Act. The subpoenas and discovery may be ordered to the same extent and subject to the same limitations as would apply if the subpoenas or discovery were ordered or served in aid of a civil action in the district court.

(2) Witnesses summoned by a subpoena shall be entitled to the same witness and mileage fees as witnesses in proceedings in district court. Fees payable to a witness summoned by a subpoena issued at the request of a party shall be paid by that party or, when a party is unable to pay the fees, by the commission.

(3)(a) Any person who willfully fails or neglects to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce records, documents, or other evidence, if it is in such person's power to do so, in obedience to the subpoena or other lawful order under subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(b) Any person shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor who, with intent to mislead another person in any proceeding under the act:

(i) Makes or causes to be made any false entry or statement of fact in any report, account, record, or other document produced pursuant to subpoena or other lawful order under subsection (1) of this section;

(ii) Willfully neglects or fails to make or to cause to be made full, true, and correct entries in such reports, accounts, records, or other documents; or

(iii) Willfully mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary evidence.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 35.